Illinois, session 104th, SB1793.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Crematory Regulation Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5 and 40 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 18/5)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)8    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 10by the Comptroller in the applicant's or licensee's 11application file or license file. It is the duty of the 12applicant or licensee to inform the Comptroller of any change 13of address within 14 days, and such changes must be made either 14through the Comptroller's website or by contacting the 15Comptroller. The address of record shall be the permanent 16street address of the crematory. 17    "Alternative container" means a receptacle, other than a 18casket, in which human remains are transported to the 19crematory and placed in the cremation chamber for cremation. 20An alternative container shall be (i) composed of readily 21combustible or consumable materials suitable for cremation, 22(ii) able to be closed in order to provide a complete covering 23for the human remains, (iii) resistant to leakage or spillage,   SB1793 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10083 BDA 20155 b1(iv) rigid enough for handling with ease, and (v) able to 2provide protection for the health, safety, and personal 3integrity of crematory personnel.4    "Authorizing agent" means a person legally entitled to 5order the cremation and final disposition of specific human 6remains. "Authorizing agent" includes an institution of 7medical, mortuary, or other sciences as provided in Section 20 8of the Disposition of Remains of the Indigent Act.9    "Body parts" means limbs or other portions of the anatomy 10that are removed from a person or human remains for medical 11purposes during treatment, surgery, biopsy, autopsy, or 12medical research; or human bodies or any portion of bodies 13that have been donated to science for medical research 14purposes.15    "Burial transit permit" means a permit for disposition of 16a dead human body as required by Illinois law.17    "Casket" means a rigid container that is designed for the 18encasement of human remains, is usually constructed of wood, 19metal, or like material and ornamented and lined with fabric, 20and may or may not be combustible.21    "Chain of custody record" means a record that establishes 22the continuous control of the deceased's body, body parts, or 23human remains. 24    "Comptroller" means the Comptroller of the State of 25Illinois.26    "Cremated remains" means all human remains recovered after   SB1793 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10083 BDA 20155 b1the completion of the cremation, which may possibly include 2the residue of any foreign matter including casket material, 3bridgework, or eyeglasses, that was cremated with the human 4remains.5    "Cremation" means the technical process, using heat and 6flame, or alkaline hydrolysis that reduces human remains to 7bone fragments. The reduction takes place through heat and 8evaporation or through hydrolysis. Cremation shall include the 9processing, and may include the pulverization, of the bone 10fragments.11    "Cremation chamber" means the enclosed space within which 12the cremation takes place.13    "Cremation interment container" means a rigid outer 14container that, subject to a cemetery's rules and regulations, 15is composed of concrete, steel, fiberglass, or some similar 16material in which an urn is placed prior to being interred in 17the ground, and which is designed to withstand prolonged 18exposure to the elements and to support the earth above the 19urn.20    "Cremation room" means the room in which the cremation 21chamber is located.22    "Crematory" means the building or portion of a building 23that houses the cremation room and the holding facility.24    "Crematory authority" means the legal entity which is 25licensed by the Comptroller to operate a crematory and to 26perform cremations.  SB1793 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10083 BDA 20155 b1    "Final disposition" means the burial, cremation, or other 2disposition of a dead human body or parts of a dead human body.3    "Funeral director" means a person known by the title of 4"funeral director", "funeral director and embalmer", or other 5similar words or titles, licensed by the State to practice 6funeral directing or funeral directing and embalming.7    "Funeral establishment" means a building or separate 8portion of a building having a specific street address and 9location and devoted to activities relating to the shelter, 10care, custody, and preparation of a deceased human body and 11may contain facilities for funeral or wake services.12    "Holding facility" means an area that (i) is designated 13for the retention of human remains prior to cremation, (ii) 14complies with all applicable public health law, (iii) 15preserves the health and safety of the crematory authority 16personnel, and (iv) is secure from access by anyone other than 17authorized persons. A holding facility may be located in a 18cremation room.19    "Human remains" means the body of a deceased person, 20including any form of body prosthesis that has been 21permanently attached or implanted in the body.22    "Licensee" means an entity licensed under this Act. An 23entity that holds itself as a licensee or that is accused of 24unlicensed practice is considered a licensee for purposes of 25enforcement, investigation, hearings, and the Illinois 26Administrative Procedure Act.   SB1793 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10083 BDA 20155 b1    "Niche" means a compartment or cubicle for the 2memorialization and permanent placement of an urn containing 3cremated remains.4    "Person" means any person, partnership, association, 5corporation, limited liability company, or other entity, and 6in the case of any such business organization, its officers, 7partners, members, or shareholders possessing 25% or more of 8ownership of the entity. 9    "Processing" means the reduction of identifiable bone 10fragments after the completion of the cremation process to 11unidentifiable bone fragments by manual or mechanical means.12    "Pulverization" means the reduction of identifiable bone 13fragments after the completion of the cremation process to 14granulated particles by manual or mechanical means.15    "Scattering area" means an area which may be designated by 16a cemetery and located on dedicated cemetery property or 17property used for outdoor recreation or natural resource 18conservation owned by the Department of Natural Resources and 19designated as a scattering area, where cremated remains, which 20have been removed from their container, can be mixed with, or 21placed on top of, the soil, or ground cover, or, in limited 22scenarios that comply with the requirements under subsection 23(b) of Section 40, water.24    "Temporary container" means a receptacle for cremated 25remains, usually composed of cardboard, plastic or similar 26material, that can be closed in a manner that prevents the   SB1793 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10083 BDA 20155 b1leakage or spillage of the cremated remains or the entrance of 2foreign material, and is a single container of sufficient size 3to hold the cremated remains until an urn is acquired or the 4cremated remains are scattered.5    "Uniquely identified" means providing the deceased with 6individualized identification. 7    "Urn" means a receptacle designed to encase the cremated 8remains.9(Source: P.A. 103-907, eff. 1-1-25.) 10    (410 ILCS 18/40)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)12    Sec. 40. Disposition of cremated remains. 13    (a) The authorizing agent shall be responsible for the 14final disposition of the cremated remains.15    (b) Cremated remains may be disposed of by placing them in 16a grave, crypt, or niche, by scattering them in a scattering 17area as defined in this Act, or in any manner whatever on the 18private property of a consenting owner. When a deceased 19individual is a member of a religion where the tenets of their 20faith require the scattering of that individual's cremated 21remains in water, the deceased individual's cremated remains 22may be scattered in an Illinois river without approval through 23the Department of Natural Resources' permit process as long as 24the scattering of the cremated remains is: (1) limited to one 25deceased individual; (2) spread over an area large enough to   SB1793 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10083 BDA 20155 b1avoid leaving an identifiable accumulation of remains; (3) out 2of sight of any public use areas, including, but not limited 3to, roads, walkways, trails, picnic areas, campgrounds, and 4parking lots; and (4) conducted in a manner in which no other 5objects, including, but not limited to, any cremation 6identification disc, body prosthesis, or artificial organ, 7other than pulverized cremated remains, are scattered into a 8river. Nothing in this subsection (b) grants an individual 9authority to trespass on private property. 10    (c) Upon the completion of the cremation process, and 11except as provided for in item (I) of paragraph (1) of 12subsection (a) of Section 20, if the crematory authority has 13not been instructed to arrange for the interment, entombment, 14inurnment, or scattering of the cremated remains, the 15crematory authority shall deliver the cremated remains to the 16individual specified on the cremation authorization form, or 17if no individual is specified then to the authorizing agent. 18The delivery may be made in person or by registered mail. Upon 19receipt of the cremated remains, the individual receiving them 20may transport them in any manner in this State without a 21permit, and may dispose of them in accordance with this 22Section. After delivery, the crematory authority shall be 23discharged from any legal obligation or liability concerning 24the cremated remains. 25    (d) If, after a period of 60 days from the date of the 26cremation, the authorizing agent or the agent's designee has   SB1793 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10083 BDA 20155 b1not instructed the crematory authority to arrange for the 2final disposition of the cremated remains or claimed the 3cremated remains, the crematory authority may dispose of the 4cremated remains in any manner permitted by this Section. The 5crematory authority, however, shall keep a permanent record 6identifying the site of final disposition. The authorizing 7agent shall be responsible for reimbursing the crematory 8authority for all reasonable expenses incurred in disposing of 9the cremated remains. Upon disposing of the cremated remains, 10the crematory authority shall be discharged from any legal 11obligation or liability concerning the cremated remains. Any 12person who was in possession of cremated remains prior to the 13effective date of this Act may dispose of them in accordance 14with this Section.15    (e) Except with the express written permission of the 16authorizing agent, no person shall:17        (1) Dispose of cremated remains in a manner or in a 18    location so that the cremated remains are commingled with 19    those of another person. This prohibition shall not apply 20    to the scattering of cremated remains at sea, by air, or in 21    an area located in a dedicated cemetery and used 22    exclusively for those purposes.23        (2) Place cremated remains of more than one person in 24    the same temporary container or urn.25(Source: P.A. 96-863, eff. 3-1-12; 97-679, eff. 2-6-12.)